Utah statutes.
67-19a-101.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Administrator" means the person appointed under Section 67-19a-201 to head the Career Service Review Office.

(2)  "Career service employee" means a person employed in career service as defined in Section 67-19-3.

(3)  "Employer" means the state of Utah and all supervisory personnel vested with the authority to implement and administer the policies of an agency.

(4)  "Grievance" means:

(a)  a complaint by a career service employee concerning any matter touching upon the relationship between the employee and the employer; and

(b)  any dispute between a career service employee and the employer.

(5)  "Office" means the Career Service Review Office created under Section 67-19a-201.

(6)  "Supervisor" means the person:

(a)  to whom an employee reports; or

(b)  who assigns and oversees an employee's work.



Amended by Chapter 249, 2010 General Session

